Georgia statutes. 
Claim based on actions taken without authority of law. - Plaintiff businessman, who was refused a certificate of occupancy for a garden center based on the inadequacy of a deceleration/acceleration lane, proved a cause of action against city officials under O.C.G.A. § 36-33-4 since the policy regarding construction of the lane was not based on an ordinance setting forth guidelines or specific factors sufficient to apprise citizens of what to expect and, thus, actions taken pursuant to such policy were without authority of law; further, plaintiff's testimony that plaintiff expended $2,800 to extend the lane beyond the length required for DOT approval was sufficient to show special damages. City of Buford v. Ward, 212 Ga. App. 752, 443 S.E.2d 279 (1994).

Trial court erred in finding that a mayor was entitled to official immunity in city employees' action for wrongful termination because a question of fact remained as to whether the mayor acted without authority of law by failing to comply with the city's resolution requiring the mayor to get city council approval prior to any termination. Owens v. City of Greenville, 290 Ga. 557, 722 S.E.2d 755 (2012).

Immunity from liability. - Public official who fails to perform purely ministerial duties required by law is subject to an action for damages by one who is injured by the official's omission; however, when an officer is invested with discretion and is empowered to exercise the officer's judgment in matters brought before the officer, the officer is sometimes called a quasi-judicial officer, and when so acting the officer is usually given immunity from liability to persons who may be injured as a result of an erroneous decision, provided the acts complained of are done within the scope of the officer's authority, and without wilfulness, malice, or corruption. McDay v. City of Atlanta, 204 Ga. App. 621, 420 S.E.2d 75, cert. denied, 204 Ga. App. 922, 420 S.E.2d 75 (1992).

Police officer's conduct in arresting plaintiff, while unprofessional, was not willful, fraudulent, corrupt, or malicious; therefore, the officer enjoyed limited immunity. Corporate Prop. Investors v. Milon, 249 Ga. App. 699, 549 S.E.2d 157 (2001).

City manager had official immunity in a defamation case under Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. II, Para. IX(d) and O.C.G.A. § 36-33-4 since: (1) the city finance director did not show that a statement the city manager made to the media regarding the city manager's concerns in the city finance director's department was outside the scope of the city manager's authority; (2) the city manager did not disclose anything to the city finance director's prospective employer that the prospective employer did not obtain through a Georgia Open Records Act, O.C.G.A. § 50-18-70 et seq., request; and (3) there was no policy that prohibited the city manager from verbally responding in conjunction with the city manager's Open Records Act response. Smith v. Lott, 317 Ga. App. 37, 730 S.E.2d 663 (2012).

Appellate court erred by affirming the grant of the individual defendants' motion to dismiss in a personal injury suit involving a pedestrian falling at a high school because whether official immunity barred the action was a fact-specific inquiry that had not been definitively answered since limited discovery had been undertaken. Austin v. Clark, 294 Ga. 773, 755 S.E.2d 796 (2014).

Trial court properly granted summary judgment to the mayor and the council member defendants based on governmental liability because the remedies provided under O.C.G.A. § 36-33-4 could not be judicially grafted onto the Whistleblower Act, O.C.G.A. § 45-1-4, which does not mention that code section, nor provides for individual liability. Rintoul v. Tolbert, 341 Ga. App. 688, 802 S.E.2d 56 (2017).

Individual not liable if sued in official capacity. - Notwithstanding the provisions of O.C.G.A. § 36-33-4, a drinking water commissioner could not be held personally liable for requiring a water customer to extend a water main because the commissioner was not sued in the commissioner's individual capacity. The city could be held liable for the commissioner's actions because, although the actions were unauthorized, the actions were within the scope of the commissioner's employment. City of Atlanta v. Harbor Grove Apts., LLC, 308 Ga. App. 57, 706 S.E.2d 722 (2011).

Merely styling a suit against a public officer as one brought against the officer personally does not deprive the officer of any immunity to which the officer might otherwise be entitled for the officer's official acts. McDay v. City of Atlanta, 204 Ga. App. 621, 420 S.E.2d 75, cert. denied, 204 Ga. App. 922, 420 S.E.2d 75 (1992).

Evidence insufficient to lift immunity. - Trial court correctly granted summary judgment in favor of police chief when the record was devoid of any conduct by the chief which could remotely be construed as being sufficient to lift the shield that protects public officers acting colore officii; therefore the plaintiff was not allowed to recover for the plaintiff's spouse's suicide while in police custody. McDay v. City of Atlanta, 204 Ga. App. 621, 420 S.E.2d 75, cert. denied, 204 Ga. App. 922, 420 S.E.2d 75 (1992).

Evidence did not support plaintiff's claim of conspiracy against the plaintiff by municipal officials based upon the city's issuance of citations for an electrical code violation and for having a derelict car on the plaintiff's premises. Brown v. City of Chamblee, 211 Ga. App. 45, 438 S.E.2d 396 (1993).

Trial court properly granted summary judgment to police officer on the arrested individual's claims against the officer arising out of the individual's arrest for criminal trespass as the officer was performing a discretionary duty at the time of the arrest and no showing was made that the officer acted maliciously or with an intent to injure; accordingly, the officer was entitled to official immunity from liability. Reese v. City of Atlanta, 261 Ga. App. 761, 583 S.E.2d 584 (2003).

It is a jury question as to whether acts of a city manager in breaching a contract to perform a ministerial duty falls within provisions of O.C.G.A. § 36-33-4. City of Douglas v. Johnson, 157 Ga. App. 618, 278 S.E.2d 160 (1981).

Nonliability for abatement of nuisance. - When the council of a municipal corporation, in the exercise of the municipality's police powers, and after due notice, declare a building to be a nuisance, and require the building to be torn down, the council would not be liable as individuals to the owner for damages, unless the council acted maliciously, oppressively, corruptly, or without authority of law. Pruden v. Love, 67 Ga. 190 (1881).

Claim of nuisance created by failure to maintain and repair sewer lines. - Plaintiff's assertion that the failure of the city to properly maintain and identify the repairs needed on the sewer lines was a nuisance did not give rise to a right of action in nuisance as to plaintiffs. Rea v. Bunce, 179 Ga. App. 628, 347 S.E.2d 676 (1986), cert. denied and appeal dismissed, 484 U.S. 998, 108 S. Ct. 685, 98 L. Ed. 2d 638 (1988).

Applicability to council member presiding in police court. - This section has no application to acts of a member of a town council when the member is presiding in a police court. Calhoun v. Little, 106 Ga. 336, 32 S.E. 86 (1898).

Revocation of permit. - Provisions of this section as to oppressive, malicious, corrupt, and unlawful acts could not be applied to the acts of a mayor when the petition did not allege that the mayor by force, threats, or any means whatsoever prevented the plaintiff from conducting plaintiff's business or exercising the privilege and license, or canceled or revoked the permit, and only alleged that the mayor notified the plaintiff to the effect that the plaintiff's permit was void and that the plaintiff could not operate an abattoir. Davis v. Johnson, 92 Ga. App. 858, 90 S.E.2d 426 (1955).

Cited in Foster v. Crowder, 117 Ga. App. 568, 161 S.E.2d 364 (1968); Koehler v. Massell, 229 Ga. 359, 191 S.E.2d 830 (1972); Copeland v. Young, 133 Ga. App. 54, 209 S.E.2d 719 (1974); Wilson v. Strange, 235 Ga. 156, 219 S.E.2d 88 (1975); Pitts v. City of Macon, 134 Ga. App. 467, 214 S.E.2d 720 (1975); Knight v. Troup County Bd. of Educ., 144 Ga. App. 634, 242 S.E.2d 263 (1978); Gaskins v. Hand, 219 Ga. App. 823, 466 S.E.2d 688 (1996); Oglethorpe Dev. Group, Inc. v. Coleman, 271 Ga. 173, 516 S.E.2d 531 (1999).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, §§ 133, 243 et seq. 63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Officers and Employees, §§ 295, 330.

ALR. - Personal liability of public official for personal injury on highway, 40 A.L.R. 39; 57 A.L.R. 1037.

Personal liability of municipal officer or employee for negligence in performance of duty, 40 A.L.R. 1358; 53 A.L.R. 381.

Liability of municipal officers for diversion of money from one fund to another, 96 A.L.R. 664.

Civil liability of law enforcement officers for malicious prosecution, 28 A.L.R.2d 646; 81 A.L.R.4th 1031.

Personal liability of policeman, sheriff, or other peace officer, or bond, for negligently causing personal injury or death, 60 A.L.R.2d 873.

Civil liability of school officials for malicious prosecution, 66 A.L.R.2d 749.

Liability for personal injury or damage from operation of fire department vehicle, 82 A.L.R.2d 312.

36-33-5. Written demand prerequisite to action for injury to person or property; time for presenting claim and for consideration by governing authority; suspension of limitations; statement of specific amount of monetary damages sought; service of claim on city officials.

Statute text

(a) No person, firm, or corporation having a claim for money damages against any municipal corporation on account of injuries to person or property shall bring any action against the municipal corporation for such injuries, without first giving notice as provided in this Code section.

(b) Within six months of the happening of the event upon which a claim against a municipal corporation is predicated, the person, firm, or corporation having the claim shall present the claim in writing to the governing authority of the municipal corporation for adjustment, stating the time, place, and extent of the injury, as nearly as practicable, and the negligence which caused the injury. No action shall be entertained by the courts against the municipal corporation until the cause of action therein has first been presented to the governing authority for adjustment.

(c) Upon the presentation of such claim, the governing authority shall consider and act upon the claim within 30 days from the presentation; and the action of the governing authority, unless it results in the settlement thereof, shall in no sense be a bar to an action therefor in the courts.

(d) The running of the statute of limitations shall be suspended during the time that the demand for payment is pending before such authorities without action on their part.

(e) The description of the extent of the injury required in subsection (b) of this Code section shall include the specific amount of monetary damages being sought from the municipal corporation. The amount of monetary damages set forth in such claim shall constitute an offer of compromise. In the event such claim is not settled by the municipal corporation and the claimant litigates such claim, the amount of monetary damage set forth in such claim shall not be binding on the claimant.

(f) A claim submitted under this Code section shall be served upon the mayor or the chairperson of the city council or city commission, as the case may be, by delivering the claim to such official personally or by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery.

History

(Ga. L. 1899, p. 74, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 910; Code 1933, § 69-308; Ga. L. 1953, Ex. Sess., p. 338, § 1; Ga. L. 1956, p. 183, § 1; Ga. L. 2014, p. 125, § 1/HB 135.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article, "Georgia Municipal Tort Liability: Ante Litem Notice," see 4 Ga. L. Rev. 134 (1969). For article surveying legislative and judicial developments in Georgia local government law for 1978-79, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 155 (1979). For article surveying developments in Georgia local government law from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 187 (1981). For article surveying developments in Georgia torts law from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 247 (1981). For annual survey of local government law, see 35 Mercer L. Rev. 233 (1983). For annual survey of torts law, see 35 Mercer L. Rev. 291 (1983). For article, "Defending the Lawsuit: A First-Round Checklist," see 22 Ga. St. B. J. 24 (1985). For annual survey of local government law, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (1986). For annual survey article discussing local government law, see 51 Mercer L. Rev. 397 (1999). For annual survey article on local government law, see 52 Mercer L. Rev. 341 (2000). For article, "Local Government Law," see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 389 (2001). For survey article on local government law for the period from June 1, 2002 to May 31, 2003, see 55 Mercer L. Rev. 353 (2003). For annual survey of local government law, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 351 (2004). For annual survey of local government law, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (2005). For annual survey of local government law, see 58 Mercer L. Rev. 267 (2006). For survey article on local government law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 285 (2007). For survey article on local government law, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 263 (2008). For annual survey on local government law, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 135 (2014). For annual survey on trial practice and procedure, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 211 (2014). For survey article on local government law, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 147 (2015). For annual survey on trial practice and procedure, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 257 (2015). For annual survey on local government law, see 68 Mercer L. Rev. 199 (2016). For annual survey on labor and employment law, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 141 (2017). For annual survey on local government law, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 205 (2017).

For note, "Taking a Toll on the Equities: Governing the Effect of the PLRA'S Exhaustion Requirements on State Statutes of Limitations," 47 Ga. L. Rev. 1321 (2013).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

ANALYSIS

General Consideration

Sufficiency of Notice

Formalities of Notice

Waiver and Estoppel

Time of Notice and Action

Procedure

General Consideration

Constitutionality. - O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5 does not violate the constitutional guarantees of either due process or equal protection. Shoemaker v. Aldmor Mgt., Inc., 249 Ga. 430, 291 S.E.2d 549 (1982).

This section is in derogation of the common law and should be strictly construed as against the municipality. Maryon v. City of Atlanta, 149 Ga. 35, 99 S.E. 116 (1919); Scearce v. Mayor of Gainesville, 33 Ga. App. 411, 126 S.E. 883, cert. denied, 33 Ga. App. 829 (1925); City of Atlanta v. Hawkins, 45 Ga. App. 847, 166 S.E. 262 (1932); City of Rome v. Stone, 46 Ga. App. 259, 167 S.E. 325 (1933); Jones v. Mayor of Savannah, 52 Ga. App. 537, 184 S.E. 353 (1936); Mayor of Buford v. Light, 65 Ga. App. 99, 15 S.E.2d 459 (1941); City of Atlanta v. J.J. Black & Co., 110 Ga. App. 667, 139 S.E.2d 515 (1964); Bush v. City of Albany, 125 Ga. App. 558, 188 S.E.2d 245 (1972); Hicks v. City of Atlanta, 154 Ga. App. 809, 270 S.E.2d 58 (1980).

Purpose of this section was simply to give to the municipality notice that the citizen or property owner has a grievance against the municipality. Carruthers v. City of Hawkinsville, 171 Ga. 313, 155 S.E. 520 (1930), answer conformed to, 42 Ga. App. 476, 156 S.E. 634 (1931); City of Atlanta v. Blackmon, 50 Ga. App. 448, 178 S.E. 467 (1935); Jones v. Mayor of Savannah, 52 Ga. App. 537, 184 S.E. 353 (1936); Jones v. City Council, 100 Ga. App. 268, 110 S.E.2d 691 (1959); City of Fairburn v. Clanton, 102 Ga. App. 556, 117 S.E.2d 197 (1960); City of Atlanta v. J.J. Black & Co., 110 Ga. App. 667, 139 S.E.2d 515 (1964); Holland v. Calhoun, 114 Ga. App. 51, 150 S.E.2d 155, rev'd on other grounds, 222 Ga. 817, 152 S.E.2d 752 (1966); City of Atlanta v. Frank, 120 Ga. App. 273, 170 S.E.2d 265 (1969); Bush v. City of Albany, 125 Ga. App. 558, 188 S.E.2d 245 (1972); Dennis v. City of Palmetto, 130 Ga. App. 242, 202 S.E.2d 717 (1973); Washington v. City of Columbus, 136 Ga. App. 682, 222 S.E.2d 583 (1975).

Purpose and intent of the legislature in the adoption of O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5 was fourfold: (1) to afford the officials of an offending city opportunity to investigate the complaint at a time when the evidence relative thereto is calculated to be more readily available; (2) to afford the officials an opportunity, if the complaint relates to a continuing nuisance, to take proper steps to abate the nuisance before the effects thereof become great or far-reaching; (3) to bar a claimant's right of recovery for any and all claims arising by reasons of matters that may have transpired or existed giving rise to a cause of action on dates more than six months prior to the giving of the required ante litem notice; and (4) to afford the city an opportunity to negotiate a settlement of such claims as the city may determine to be meritorious before litigation is commenced, thus protecting the interests of the general public by reducing the exposure of the funds in the city treasury to depletion from growing claims for damages. City of Gainesville v. Moss, 108 Ga. App. 713, 134 S.E.2d 547 (1963), overruled on other grounds, City of Chamblee v. Maxwell, 264 Ga. 635, 452 S.E.2d 488 (1994); Robinette v. Johnston, 637 F. Supp. 922 (M.D. Ga. 1986).

Notice requirement is a statute of limitations, and satisfaction of the requirement is a condition precedent to maintaining a lawsuit on a claim against a municipality. Everett v. Napper, 632 F. Supp. 1481 (N.D. Ga. 1986), aff'd in part, rev'd in part on other grounds, 833 F.2d 1507 (11th Cir. 1987).

Applicability to whistleblower claims. - Like other statutes of limitations, this statute of limitations does not begin to run in the case of continuing torts until the injury is discovered; therefore, former jail inmates' suit against a town for compelling the inmates, while incarcerated, to perform clean-up work on a contaminated building was not time-barred. City of Forsyth v. Bell, 258 Ga. App. 331, 574 S.E.2d 331 (2002).

City employee who filed suit under the Georgia Whistleblower Act, O.C.G.A. § 45-1-4, seeking money damages, among other remedies, was not required to provide written notice of the employee's claim within six months of the alleged retaliation under the municipal ante litem notice statute, O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5, because the claim was not a negligence claim. West v. City of Albany, 300 Ga. 743, 797 S.E.2d 809 (2017).

Use of summary judgment. - When property owners assert claims against a municipality, flexibility by the court is required in determining whether compliance with the ante litem notice requirements of O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5 is properly considered a matter in abatement which must be raised in a motion to dismiss under O.C.G.A. § 9-11-12; accordingly, consideration of the matter within the summary judgment context, pursuant to O.C.G.A. § 9-11-56, was proper because matters outside of the pleadings, including the owners' depositions, were considered. Davis v. City of Forsyth, 275 Ga. App. 747, 621 S.E.2d 495 (2005).

Purpose of notice requirement is to apprise city of claim in order that the city may determine whether or not to adjust the claim without suit. Tanner v. City of Gainesville, 162 Ga. App. 405, 290 S.E.2d 541 (1982); Jones v. City of Austell, 166 Ga. App. 808, 305 S.E.2d 653 (1983).

Notice not protected First Amendment speech. - Plaintiff's ante litem notice against the city did not constitute speech protected by the First Amendment. Holbrook v. City of Alpharetta, 112 F.3d 1522 (11th Cir. 1997).

Claim for attorney fees and costs. - Plaintiff's failure to comply with the notice requirement of O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5 precluded the plaintiff's ability to sue for money damages in the form of attorney fees and costs of litigation under O.C.G.A. § 13-6-11. Dover v. City of Jackson, 246 Ga. App. 524, 541 S.E.2d 92 (2000).

Firefighters' request for costs of litigation, including attorney fees, was properly submitted to the jury in the firefighters' class action, challenging a promotional examination, as the firefighters were not statutorily required to give ante-litem notice to the city. City of Atlanta v. Bennett, 322 Ga. App. 726, 746 S.E.2d 198 (2013).

Identification with former § 15-10-16. - The Georgia Court of Appeals has identified former § 15-10-16, concerning actions against justices of the peace, with the municipal ante litem notice provision contained in O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5. Doss v. Long, 93 F.R.D. 112 (N.D. Ga. 1981).

O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5 provides that ante litem notice be given the city as a condition precedent to suit against the city. Jones v. City of Austell, 166 Ga. App. 808, 305 S.E.2d 653 (1983).

Effect of failure to comply. - Failure to comply with the provisions of this law within the time required thereby is a bar to any right of action against a municipality, and the giving of such notice is a condition precedent to the bringing of any action against a municipality. City of Atlanta v. Barrett, 102 Ga. App. 469, 116 S.E.2d 654 (1960); City of Gainesville v. Moss, 108 Ga. App. 713, 134 S.E.2d 547 (1963), overruled on other grounds, City of Chamblee v. Maxwell, 264 Ga. 635, 452 S.E.2d 488 (1994); Stambaugh v. City of Demorest, 221 Ga. 527, 145 S.E.2d 539 (1965); City of Atlanta v. Frank, 120 Ga. App. 273, 170 S.E.2d 265 (1969); Schaefer v. Mayor of Athens, 120 Ga. App. 301, 170 S.E.2d 339 (1969); Bituminous Cas. Corp. v. R.D.C., Inc., 334 F. Supp. 1163 (N.D. Ga. 1971); Dennis v. City of Palmetto, 130 Ga. App. 242, 202 S.E.2d 717 (1973); Goen v. City of Atlanta, 224 Ga. App. 484, 481 S.E.2d 244 (1997); Whipple v. City of Cordele, 231 Ga. App. 274, 499 S.E.2d 113 (1998); Stanford v. City of Manchester, 246 Ga. App. 129, 539 S.E.2d 845 (2000).

Effect of section as conferring immunity. - Before the enactment of former Code 1933, § 69-308 (see O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5) requiring a demand, the liability of every municipal corporation in Georgia, under former Code 1933, § 69-301 (see O.C.G.A. § 36-33-1), was unqualified and unconditional. By the enactment of former Code 1933, § 69-308 the unqualified liability of each municipal corporation became conditional upon the demand required by the statute. City of Atlanta v. Hudgins, 193 Ga. 618, 19 S.E.2d 508 (1942).

Elements of section. - This section consists of both a time limitation and a requirement of exhaustion of administrative remedies. Ehlers v. City of Decatur, 614 F.2d 54 (5th Cir. 1980).

No conflict with other sections. - There is no conflict between the statute of limitation applicable to insurance suits against municipalities and the constitutional and statutory provisions relating to waiver of immunity. Cobb v. Board of Comm'rs of Rds. & Revenue, 151 Ga. App. 472, 260 S.E.2d 496 (1979).

Applies only against municipal corporations. - By its plain terms, O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5(d) applies only against municipal corporations, whether under the Georgia Tort Claims Act, O.C.G.A. § 50-21-20 et seq., or otherwise. Foster v. Ga. Reg'l Transp. Auth., 297 Ga. 714, 777 S.E.2d 446 (2015).

Tort claims against city barred because of the failure to comply with ante-litem notice statute. Camp v. City of Columbus, 252 Ga. 120, 311 S.E.2d 834 (1984); Fulton v. City of Roswell, 982 F. Supp. 1472 (N.D. Ga. 1997).

When plaintiff failed to give the required notice of the plaintiff's state tort claims against a city, plaintiff's state tort claims against the city were barred as a matter of law. Young v. City of Atlanta, 631 F. Supp. 1498 (N.D. Ga. 1986).

In a civil rights action, plaintiff was awarded attorney's fees and costs incident to the assertion of a frivolous defense by the defendant-city that dismissal was appropriate because the city had not received ante litem notice of the suit. Booker v. City of Atlanta, 586 F. Supp. 340 (N.D. Ga. 1984), aff'd, 827 F.2d 774 (11th Cir. 1987).

Applicability of section to 42 U.S.C. § 1983 actions. - Action against city under 42 U.S.C. § 1983 is materially different from a negligence suit required to be submitted for adjustment under O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5; therefore § 1983 provides a remedy independent of any provided by state law and, consequently, the ante litem notice requirement does not apply to § 1983 actions. Williams v. Posey, 475 F. Supp. 133 (M.D. Ga. 1979); Ehlers v. City of Decatur, 614 F.2d 54 (5th Cir. 1980); Robinette v. Johnston, 637 F. Supp. 922 (M.D. Ga. 1986).

Requirement of notice in O.C.G.A § 36-33-5 does not apply to an action brought under 42 U.S.C. § 1983. City of Atlanta v. J.A. Jones Constr. Co., 195 Ga. App. 72, 392 S.E.2d 564 (1990), rev'd and remanded on other grounds, 260 Ga. 658, 398 S.E.2d 369 (1990), cert. denied, 500 U.S. 928, 111 S. Ct. 2042, 114 L. Ed. 2d 126 (1991).

Trial court erred in holding that plaintiff's action against the city was barred by the plaintiff's failure to give ante litem notice since the notice provisions of O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5 do not apply to actions filed pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1983. Armour v. Davidson, 203 Ga. App. 12, 416 S.E.2d 92, cert. denied, 202 Ga. App. 905, S.E.2d (1992).

Former psychiatric inmate's pro se complaint against a city in which the inmate alleged civil rights and other violations was properly dismissed based on the inmate's failure to comply with the ante litem notice provisions of O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5. Although the provisions did not apply to actions filed pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1983, the complaint had not been filed pursuant to § 1983, and the inmate had not alleged any facts that would give rise to § 1983 liability. White v. City of Atlanta Police Dep't, 289 Ga. App. 575, 657 S.E.2d 545 (2008).

Notice not shown. - In a nuisance suit brought by homeowners against a city, it was proper to grant the city's motion for judgment notwithstanding the verdict as to one of the homeowners on the ground that the homeowner had not given the ante litem notice required by O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5(b); the city had not stipulated that such notice had been given, and although ante litem notice given by the homeowner's spouse might have been sufficient to apprise the city of the homeowner's claim, the homeowners had not cited to where in the record the spouse's ante litem notice appeared. City of Atlanta v. Broadnax, 285 Ga. App. 430, 646 S.E.2d 279 (2007), cert. denied, No. S07C1445, 2007 Ga. LEXIS 615, 648 (Ga. 2007), overruled on other grounds, Royal Capital Dev. LLC v. Md. Cas. Co., 291 Ga. 262, 728 S.E.2d 234 (2012).

Contract not shown. - Developer which claimed that a mayor and council had breached a contract by delaying the provision of water to a subdivision had not shown the existence of a contract that would preclude the need for ante litem notice; the town had voted to construct a water line, but had not committed to a specific date for completion, and there was no other evidence that the parties had reached a meeting of the minds as to the time for installation. King v. Comfort Living, Inc., 287 Ga. App. 337, 651 S.E.2d 484 (2007).

Imposition by state of conditions precedent to civil rights suit. - By its terms this section applies to claims for money damages on account of negligence attributable to the municipality. Under 42 U.S.C. § 1983, plaintiff must prove that some policy, practice, ordinance, or regulation of the city has deprived plaintiff of plaintiff's rights under the Constitution of the United States. Williams v. Posey, 475 F. Supp. 133 (M.D. Ga. 1979).

Section 1983 plaintiff to be given benefit of effected toll. - Although plaintiffs need not comply with state exhaustion requirements before filing claims under 42 U.S.C. § 1983 in federal court, nothing prevents the plaintiffs from so doing; and given that plaintiffs may, if the plaintiffs choose, seek to exhaust state administrative remedies, the rule that federal courts must employ the applicable state statute of limitations in § 1983 cases clearly requires federal courts to give a § 1983 plaintiff the benefit of any toll effected by plaintiff's compliance with a state exhaustion requirement. Lawson v. Glover, 957 F.2d 801 (11th Cir. 1987).

Effect on special Act. - When at the time of enactment of a special law amending a city charter, providing that no suit for injury to person or property could be maintained against the city unless within 90 days from such injury written notice was given, there existed a general law, this section. This general law provided for the case covered by the special law, and the latter was repugnant to Ga. Const. 1877, Art. I, Sec. IV, Para. I (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. IV), and therefore void. City of Atlanta v. Hudgins, 193 Ga. 618, 19 S.E.2d 508 (1942).

Insurer of city not agent for purposes of notice. - Contract between a city and the city's insurer does not convert the insurer into the agent of the city for the purpose of ante litem notice required by O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5; thus, notice to a city's insurer is not substantial compliance with the requirement of notice to the governing authority of the municipality. City of LaGrange v. USAA Ins. Co., 211 Ga. App. 19, 438 S.E.2d 137 (1993); Evans v. City of Covington, 240 Ga. App. 373, 523 S.E.2d 594 (1999).

Effect of insurance statute. - Former Code 1933, § 69-308 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5) was still the law irrespective of insurance coverage, and it was not changed by former Code 1933, § 56-2437 (see now O.C.G.A. § 33-24-51). Perdue v. City Council, 137 Ga. App. 702, 225 S.E.2d 62 (1976).

Similarity to presentment of claims against county. - While former Code 1933, § 69-308 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5), providing for the filing of a claim against a municipality before suit against such municipality, was unlike the provisions of former Code 1933, § 23-1602 (see now O.C.G.A § 36-11-1) relative to the presentment of claims against a county, the objects and purposes of these two statutes were similar. Davis v. Cobb County, 65 Ga. App. 533, 15 S.E.2d 814 (1941).

Words "any suit" (now "any action") clearly mean that in every suit wherein such damages are sought, notice shall be given. Thompson v. City of Atlanta, 219 Ga. 190, 132 S.E.2d 188 (1963).

Generally accepted meaning of the phrase "governing authority" or "governing body," in reference to the operation of city or county governments, is a council or board performing legislative functions. Peek v. City of Albany, 101 Ga. App. 564, 114 S.E.2d 451 (1960).

Terminology synonymous. - General character of the claim is all that is necessary; when the word "claim," and the word "suit," and the words "cause of action," appear in this section, those words are synonymous. Carruthers v. City of Hawkinsville, 171 Ga. 313, 155 S.E. 520 (1930), answer conformed to, 42 Ga. App. 476, 156 S.E. 634 (1931).

"Claim" and "demand for payment" as used in this section have the same meaning. The presentation of the claim for adjustment is a condition precedent to bringing the action. Jones v. City Council, 100 Ga. App. 268, 110 S.E.2d 691 (1959).

Applicability to counterclaims. - Defendant property-lessor and business operator's failure to give adequate ante litem notice for counterclaims against city alleging tortious interference with their business relationship warranted dismissal of these counterclaims. Sims v. City of Alpharetta, 207 Ga. App. 411, 428 S.E.2d 94 (1993).

Applicability to breach of contract. - Ante litem notice provisions of this section do not apply to claims arising out of a breach of contract. City of Atlanta v. J.J. Black & Co., 110 Ga. App. 667, 139 S.E.2d 515 (1964).

Summary judgment for a city in a police officer's breach of contract claim was error because O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5 did not apply to contract suits, and the police officer's failure to provide ante litem notice to the city in a contract action did not bar the suit. Neely v. City of Riverdale, 298 Ga. App. 884, 681 S.E.2d 677 (2009), cert. denied, No. S09C1925, 2010 Ga. LEXIS 28 (Ga. 2010).

Subcontractor seeking to recover against a city for payment for work performed under a subcontract under theories of unjust enrichment, quantum merit, and implied obligation to pay was not required to comply with the ante litem notice requirements before filing suit because O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5(a) applied only to tort claims regarding personal injury or property damage. Contrary language in Jacks v. City of Atlanta, 284 Ga. App. 200 (2007),was disapproved. City of College Park v. Sekisui SPR Ams., LLC, 331 Ga. App. 404, 771 S.E.2d 101 (2015), cert. denied, No. S15C1141, 2015 Ga. LEXIS 471 (Ga. 2015).

Applicability to action for illegal imprisonment. - This section applies to a claim against a city for illegal imprisonment under sentence from a recorder's court. Marks v. City of Rome, 145 Ga. 399, 89 S.E. 324 (1916).

Litigant seeking injunctive relief is not bound by the requirements of this statute. Ehlers v. City of Decatur, 614 F.2d 54 (5th Cir. 1980).

Applicability to out-of-state municipalities. - This section applies not only to municipalities located in the state, but also to any other municipality. Bituminous Cas. Corp. v. R.D.C., Inc., 334 F. Supp. 1163 (N.D. Ga. 1971).

Applicability to zoning disputes. - Ante litem notice provisions applied to a claim for damages arising out of a zoning dispute. City of Walnut Grove v. Questco, Ltd., 275 Ga. 266, 564 S.E.2d 445 (2002).

Property cannot be encumbered. - City board of education has no authority to place an encumbrance upon articles which the city had unconditionally purchased on account several months previously, and which the city had installed as necessary to the operation of the schools. Southern Sch. Supply Co. v. City of Abbeville, 34 Ga. App. 93, 128 S.E. 231 (1925).

O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5, taken together with City of Chamblee v. Maxwell, 264 Ga. 635, 452 S.E.2d 488 (1994) does not stand for the proposition that a municipality's liability for the effects of a continuing nuisance or trespass is truncated by ante litem notice; the trial court did not err in allowing an owner to present evidence of damages to the owner's property due to a city's abatable nuisance for the period after the owner presented ante litem notice to the city. City of Atlanta v. Landmark Envtl. Indus., 272 Ga. App. 732, 613 S.E.2d 131 (2005).

Cited in Carruthers v. City of Hawkinsville, 42 Ga. App. 476, 156 S.E. 634 (1931); City of Atlanta v. Dinkins, 46 Ga. App. 19, 166 S.E. 429 (1932); Thrasher v. City of Atlanta, 178 Ga. 514, 173 S.E. 817 (1934); Lawrence v. City of La Grange, 63 Ga. App. 587, 11 S.E.2d 696 (1940); Cannon v. City of Macon, 81 Ga. App. 310, 58 S.E.2d 563 (1950); City of Macon v. Yaughn, 83 Ga. App. 610, 64 S.E.2d 369 (1951); City of Decatur v. Robertson, 85 Ga. App. 747, 70 S.E.2d 135 (1952); Duren v. City of Thomasville, 92 Ga. App. 706, 89 S.E.2d 840 (1955); Nimmons v. City of La Grange, 94 Ga. App. 511, 95 S.E.2d 314 (1956); City of Griffin v. McKneely, 101 Ga. App. 811, 115 S.E.2d 463 (1960); Pettaway v. City of Albany, 105 Ga. App. 739, 125 S.E.2d 568 (1962); Haygood v. City of Marietta, 108 Ga. App. 99, 131 S.E.2d 856 (1963); City of Douglas v. Cartrett, 109 Ga. App. 683, 137 S.E.2d 358 (1964); Allison v. English, 116 Ga. App. 318, 157 S.E.2d 324 (1967); Campbell v. City of Atlanta, 117 Ga. App. 824, 162 S.E.2d 213 (1968); Phillips v. Town of Fort Oglethorpe, 118 Ga. App. 62, 162 S.E.2d 771 (1968); City of Atlanta v. Mapel, 121 Ga. App. 567, 174 S.E.2d 599 (1970); Mayor of Athens v. Schaeffer, 122 Ga. App. 729, 178 S.E.2d 764 (1970); Copeland v. Young, 133 Ga. App. 54, 209 S.E.2d 719 (1974); City of E. Point v. Terhune, 144 Ga. App. 865, 242 S.E.2d 728 (1978); Lockaby v. City of Cedartown, 151 Ga. App. 281, 259 S.E.2d 683 (1979); City Council v. Lee, 153 Ga. App. 94, 264 S.E.2d 683 (1980); Claxton Poultry Co. v. City of Claxton, 155 Ga. App. 308, 271 S.E.2d 227 (1980); Acker v. City of Elberton, 176 Ga. App. 580, 336 S.E.2d 842 (1985), overruled on other grounds by West v. City of Albany, 2017 Ga. LEXIS 177 (Ga. 2017); Precise v. City of Rossville, 196 Ga. App. 870, 397 S.E.2d 133 (1990); Williams v. Department of Human Resources, 234 Ga. App. 638, 507 S.E.2d 230 (1998); City of Gainesville v. Waters, 258 Ga. App. 555, 574 S.E.2d 638 (2002); Scott v. City of Valdosta, 280 Ga. App. 481, 634 S.E.2d 472 (2006); SunTrust Bank v. Hightower, 291 Ga. App. 62, 660 S.E.2d 745 (2008); FDIC v. Loudermilk, 305 Ga. 558, 826 S.E.2d 116 (2019); Nugent v. Myles, 350 Ga. App. 442, 829 S.E.2d 623 (2019); Klingensmith v. Long County, 352 Ga. App. 21, 833 S.E.2d 608 (2019); Department of Public Safety v. Ragsdale, Ga. , 839 S.E.2d 541 (2020).

Sufficiency of Notice

Substantial compliance with this section is all that is required. Carruthers v. City of Hawkinsville, 171 Ga. 313, 155 S.E. 520 (1930), answer conformed to, 42 Ga. App. 476, 156 S.E. 634 (1931); Mayor of Savannah v. Helmken, 43 Ga. App. 84, 158 S.E. 64 (1931); City of Atlanta v. Hawkins, 45 Ga. App. 847, 166 S.E. 262 (1932); City of Rome v. Stone, 46 Ga. App. 259, 167 S.E. 325 (1933); Lundy v. City Council, 51 Ga. App. 655, 181 S.E. 237 (1935); Jones v. Mayor of Savannah, 52 Ga. App. 537, 184 S.E. 353 (1936); Olmstead v. Mayor of Savannah, 57 Ga. App. 815, 196 S.E. 923 (1938); Mayor of Buford v. Light, 65 Ga. App. 99, 15 S.E.2d 459 (1941); City of Acworth v. McLain, 99 Ga. App. 407, 108 S.E.2d 821 (1959); Caldwell v. Mayor of Savannah, 101 Ga. App. 683, 115 S.E.2d 403 (1960); Taylor v. King, 104 Ga. App. 589, 122 S.E.2d 265 (1961); City of Atlanta v. Frank, 120 Ga. App. 273, 170 S.E.2d 265 (1969); Bush v. City of Albany, 125 Ga. App. 558, 188 S.E.2d 245 (1972); City of Claxton v. Claxton Poultry Co., 134 Ga. App. 679, 215 S.E.2d 718 (1975); City of Arlington v. Smith, 238 Ga. 50, 230 S.E.2d 863 (1976); Hicks v. City of Atlanta, 154 Ga. App. 809, 270 S.E.2d 58 (1980); City of Columbus v. Preston, 155 Ga. App. 379, 270 S.E.2d 909 (1980); Jones v. City of Austell, 166 Ga. App. 808, 305 S.E.2d 653 (1983).

Property owners did not substantially comply with the notice requirement of O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5(b) in the owners' assertion, by amendment to the owners' complaint, of a personal injury claim against a municipality, arising from the continued backup of sewage on the owners' property, as the only indication in the owners' ante litem notice that the owners were seeking personal injuries was a statement that the sewage backup had "caused an ongoing health hazard"; such did not state the "extent of the injury," including the "nature, character, and particulars of the injury," and those personal injury claims were properly barred. Davis v. City of Forsyth, 275 Ga. App. 747, 621 S.E.2d 495 (2005).

Trial court erred in granting a city summary judgment because city employees substantially complied with ante litem notice requirements; a letter the employees' acting attorney sent to the mayor sufficed to place the city on notice of the general character of the complaint, namely the wrongful terminations, and, in a general way, of the time, place, and extent of the injury. Owens v. City of Greenville, 290 Ga. 557, 722 S.E.2d 755 (2012).

Trial court erred in denying a city's motion for judgment on the pleadings because it was undisputed that the property owner failed to serve either the mayor, or the chairperson of the city council or city commission; thus, the owner did not comply with the ante litem notice statute, O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5(f), which was fatal to the owner's claim. City of Albany v. GA HY Imports, LLC, 348 Ga. App. 885, 825 S.E.2d 385 (2019).
